Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202645-377
Installment loans; enforcement of provisions; cease and desist order; injunction.

Whenever the director has reasonable cause to believe that any person is violating or is threatening to or intends to violate the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act, the director may, in addition to any action provided in the act and without prejudice thereto, enter an order requiring such person to cease and desist or to refrain from such violation. An action may also be brought, on the relation of the Attorney General and the director, to enjoin such person from engaging in or continuing such violation or from doing any act or acts in furtherance of such violation. In any such action, an order or judgment may be entered awarding such preliminary or final injunction as may be deemed proper. In addition to all other means provided by law for the enforcement of a restraining order or injunction, the court, in which such action is brought, has power and jurisdiction to impound and appoint a receiver for the property and business of the defendant, including books, papers, documents, and records pertaining thereto or so much thereof as the court may deem reasonably necessary to prevent violations of the Nebraska Installment Loan and Sales Act through or by means of the use of such property and business. Such receiver, when so appointed and qualified, has such powers and duties as to custody, collection, administration, winding up, and liquidation of such property and business as shall, from time to time, be conferred upon the receiver by the court.

Laws 2025, LB474, § 98.